California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
-------------------------------------------

56254.

Any financial statement submitted to the director pursuant to the provisions of this article is confidential and shall not be divulged except if necessary for the proper determination of any court proceedings or hearing before the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1326.)
-------------------------------------------

56255.

(a) Every licensee shall prepare and preserve the accounts, records, and memoranda required by this chapter which shall fully and correctly disclose all transactions involved in his business. Licensees shall keep records which are adapted to the particular business that the licensee is conducting and in each case such records shall fully disclose all transactions in the business in sufficient detail as to be readily understood and audited. Minimum records required under this chapter are:

1. A record of cash received.

2. A record of cash disbursed.

3. A general ledger or its equivalent.

4. A record of amounts due California producers.

5. A record of amounts due others.

(b) Every licensee shall prepare and preserve records and memoranda required by this chapter which shall fully and correctly disclose the true ownership and management of such business.

(c) All records required to be kept under this chapter shall be kept for a period of four years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 632.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Commission Merchants [56271. - 56283.]

56271.

Every commission merchant, that receives any farm product for sale as a commission merchant, shall promptly make and keep a correct record which shows in detail all of the following with reference to the handling, sale, or storage of such farm product:

(a) The name and address of the consignor.

(b) The date it was received.

(c) The condition and quantity upon arrival.

(d) Date of such sale for the account of the consignor.

(e) The price for which it was sold.

(f) An itemized statement of the charges to be paid by the consignor in connection with the sale. Any services rendered for which charges are made, if not filed with the director, shall be charged at cost if not covered by a written contract. Cost-supporting data shall be available for verification.

(g) The names and addresses of all purchasers if the commission merchant has any financial interest in the business of the purchasers, or if the purchasers have any financial interest in the business of the commission merchant, directly or indirectly, as holder of the other’s corporate stock, as copartner, as lender or borrower of money to or from the other, or otherwise. Such interest shall be noted in such records following the name of any such purchaser.

(h) A lot number or other identifying mark for each consignment, which number or mark shall appear on every sales tag and every other essential record which is needed to identify each consignment from receipt through final sale. When requested by the consignor, as provided by Section 56281, a lot number shall appear on each individual farm product container. When containers are on pallets, then only the exposed containers shall be marked. When stamping or otherwise identifying each container is impractical due to the type of packaging, the container need not be marked.

(i) Any claim which has been or may be filed by the commission merchant against any person for overcharges or for damages which result from the injury or deterioration of such farm product by the act, neglect, or failure of such person. Such records shall be open to the inspection of the director and the consignor of the farm product for whom such claim is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 588.)
-------------------------------------------

56272.

When requested by his consignors, a commission merchant shall, before the close of the next business day following such request, transmit to the consignor a true written report of the quantity sold and the selling price.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 632.)
-------------------------------------------

56273.

The full amount which is realized from the sales, including all collections, overcharges, and damages, less the agreed commission and other charges, together with a complete account of sales, as provided in Section 56273.1, shall be remitted to the consignor within 10 days after receipt of the moneys by the commission merchant, unless otherwise agreed in writing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1081, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

56273.1.

(a) For purposes of this chapter, an account of sales shall be deemed complete if it consists of all of the following information:

(1) The date of shipment.

(2) The terms of the original sale concerning where and when title passes.

(3) The commodity, variety, size, and grade.

(4) The quantity shipped.

(5) The quantity disposed of in a manner other than sale by the buyer, if applicable.

(6) The original selling price.

(7) The adjusted selling price, if applicable.

(8) The reason for adjustment, if applicable.

(9) Any inspection certificate required to be obtained as stated in Section 56280.

(10) Amounts billed and collected from the buyer for services rendered to the buyer by the commission merchant.

(11) The gross and net returns received from the buyer.

(12) Any authorized commission merchant charges.

(13) Any additional amounts paid to the consignor by the commission merchant to support the original price.

(14) The net amount due the consignor.

(b) The consignor and the commission merchant may agree on the documentation necessary to support the information required by subdivision (a). The agreements shall be made, in writing, prior to the shipping season of the particular farm product.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 696, Sec. 67.5.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

56274.

In the account, the names and addresses of purchasers need not be given. Where a commission merchant has entered into a contract with two or more producers or consignors which contract provides that the returns for farm products sold for the account of such producers or consignors shall be pooled on a definite basis as to size or grade, or both, during a certain period of time, then a commission merchant shall obtain the written consent of the consignors and shall be required to render an account of sales, showing the net average pool return on each size or grade, or both, from sales made and shall keep a correct record of such sales, showing in detail all information as required in Section 56271.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 807.)
-------------------------------------------

56275.

Every licensee operating as a commission merchant shall retain a copy of all records which cover each transaction, which copy shall at all times be available for, and open to, the confidential inspection of the director, consignor, or the authorized representative of either.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 632.)
-------------------------------------------

56276.

If there is any dispute or disagreement between a consignor and a commission merchant which arises at the time of delivery as to condition, quality, grade, pack, quantity, or weight of any lot, shipment, or consignment of any farm product, the department shall furnish, upon the payment of a reasonable fee for it by the requesting party, a certificate which establishes the condition, quality, grade, pack, quantity, or weight of such lot, shipment, or consignment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

56277.

Such certificate is prima facie evidence of the truth of the statements contained therein. The presumption established by this section is a presumption affecting the burden of proof, but it does not apply in a criminal action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 632.)
-------------------------------------------

56278.

Proof of any sale of any farm product which is made by a commission merchant for less than the current market price to any person with whom he has any financial connection, directly or indirectly as owner of its corporate stock, as copartner, or otherwise, or any sale out of which such commission merchant receives, directly or indirectly, any portion of the purchase price, except the commission which is named in the licensee’s application or in a specific contract with the consignor, establishes a rebuttable presumption of fraud within the meaning of this chapter. This presumption is a presumption affecting the burden of proof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 262.)
-------------------------------------------

56279.

The burden of proof shall be upon the commission merchant to prove the correctness of any accounting required to be performed by the commission merchant pursuant to this chapter as to any transaction which may be questioned.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1081, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

56280.

(a) A commission merchant shall notify each consignor with whom he or she does business of this section. The notice shall be given in writing prior to the shipping season of the particular farm product.

 (b) No charge shall be made against a consignor’s account for a downward price adjustment or a reduction in quantity of farm products delivered due to a breach of contract, unless the commission merchant has, in his or her files, a federal-state inspection certificate, issued pursuant to the United States Agricultural Marketing Act of 1946, (7 U.S.C. 1621, et seq.), indicating the type and the extent of the substandard condition of the lot involved in the breach of contract, thereby supporting the amount charged against the consignor’s account. The commission merchant need not obtain a federal-state inspection certificate unless the lot involved is of a substandard condition.

 (c) Notwithstanding Section 56281, this section does not preclude a consignor from agreeing to a downward price adjustment or a reduction in the quantity of farm products delivered and waiving the right to inspection when the agreement was made prior to the shipping season of the particular farm product and was in writing.

(d) The federal-state inspection certificate may be substituted by a private third-party inspection, based on the standards prescribed under the United States Agricultural Marketing Act of 1946, if the director determines, to his or her satisfaction, that a federal-state inspection certificate could not reasonably be obtained. If the director determines, to his or her satisfaction, that neither a federal-state inspection certificate nor private, third-party inspection, can be reasonably obtained, a signed statement of two or more disinterested, or otherwise independent parties, who have sufficient knowledge, acquired through education or experience, to evaluate the farm product involved, may be used as substitute for the federal-state certificate or third-party inspection, in order to make a statement as to the quality and condition of the lot of farm product at the time of inspection.

 (e) Where the condition of the lot is not substandard but for other reasons, including a decline in market demand, there is a downward price adjustment, the commission merchant shall affirm, in writing, that the lot was at least of standard quality at the time of sale. The affirmation shall be attached to, or made part of, the records of the consignment.

 (f) As used in this section, “lot” means the farm product identified by the procedure set forth in subdivision (h) of Section 56271.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1081, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

56280.5.

Any agreement waiving any right guaranteed by this chapter shall set forth in exact language the provision of this code being waived. Upon request by the secretary, the commission merchant shall make the agreement available for inspection. Any agreement that does not comply with this section, or that is not made available to the secretary for inspection upon the secretary’s request, is void.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 620, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

56281.

A commission merchant shall notify each consignor with whom he or she does business of the provisions affecting the consignor that are contained in Sections 56271, 56272, 56273, 56280, 56282, and 56351, and this section. The notice shall be given in writing prior to the shipping season of the particular farm product. The notice shall include a form whereby the consignor may request notice of any adjustment by the commission merchant. The form shall also include a provision whereby the consignor may request that lot numbers be affixed on each individual farm product container as provided in subdivision (h) of Section 56271. Each commission merchant shall keep the records necessary to prove that the notices were given to each consignor in accordance with this section. A licensee operating as a commission merchant shall notify the consignor of any adjustment on a transaction, and provide reasons for the adjustment, within 48 hours.

If the commission merchant is unable to contact the consignor by telephone or in person, the notification shall be immediately provided by mail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 620, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

56282.

(a) Pursuant to this chapter, upon the verified complaint of the consignor, the secretary may disallow to a commission merchant, all or part of, any adjustment charged back to any consignor similarly situated, if the secretary determines that there is insufficient justification of the condition or circumstances requiring the adjustment.

(b) In determining whether there is insufficient justification for an adjustment, the secretary shall first determine if any waivers or agreements have been entered into pursuant to this chapter. If a waiver or agreement has been entered into and the secretary determines that the waiver or agreement complies with Section 56280.5 and does not otherwise violate this chapter, the secretary’s inquiry in determining this adjustment shall be governed by the terms and conditions of the waiver or agreement.

(c) If there is no waiver or agreement, or if the waiver or agreement violates this chapter, as determined by the secretary, in determining whether there is insufficient justification for an adjustment, the secretary shall consider, among other things, the following:

(1) The certificate issued pursuant to Section 56280 or 56351 does not support breach of contract.

(2) The perishability of the farm product involved and the timely issuance of the certificate pursuant to Section 56280 or 56352.

(3) Market reports or other market evidence does not support a downward price adjustment in accordance with Section 56279.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 620, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

56283.

Every commission merchant who receives any farm product for sale on consignment shall exercise reasonable care and diligence in disposing of the product in a fair and reasonable manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 942, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Dealers [56301. - 56302.5.]

56301.

Every licensee operating as a dealer who purchases any farm product from the producer of the farm product or from any licensee for the purpose of resale, shall promptly make and keep a correct record which shows in detail all of the following:

(a) The name and address of the producer or licensee.

(b) The date received.

(c) The price to be paid.

(d) An itemized statement of any charges paid by the dealer for the account of the seller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 871.)
-------------------------------------------

56302.

Every dealer shall pay for any farm product purchased by him at the time and in the manner specified in the contract with the producer or licensee. If no time for payment is set by such contract or made at the time of the delivery, the dealer shall pay for the farm product within 30 days from the delivery or taking possession of such farm product.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 871.)
-------------------------------------------

56302.5.

Upon the following, a licensee operating as a dealer shall notify the seller on a form to be prescribed by the department, as to the requirements set forth in Sections 56302 and 56620:

(a) Upon delinquency of a contract.

(b) If payment is not made within 30 days when the contract does not specify time of payment or if there is no contract.

(c) If payment is not made within 30 days when the contract is oral, irrespective of the agreed time of payment.

The dealer shall have the burden of proof as to the timely delivery of such a notice.

Such a notice shall only be required as to the first contract between any particular seller and dealer during any one calendar year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 400.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Brokers [56331. - 56332.]

56331.

(a) Every licensee operating as a broker, upon negotiating the sale of farm products, shall issue to both buyer and seller a written memorandum of sale, before the close of the next business day, showing price, date of delivery, quality, and all other details concerned in the transaction.

(b) The memorandum required by subdivision (a) shall have an individual identifying number printed upon it. The numbers shall be organized and printed on the memoranda so that each memorandum can be identified and accounted for sequentially. Unused or damaged memoranda shall be retained by the broker for accounting purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1170.)
-------------------------------------------

56332.

A licensee operating as a broker shall not alter the terms of the transaction as specified on his original memorandum of sale without the consent of both parties to the transaction. Upon making such change, the broker is required to issue a clearly marked corrected memorandum of sale, which shall clearly indicate the date and time when such adjustment or change was made, and shall transmit such corrected memorandum to both buyer and seller before the close of the next business day.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1170.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Claims of Licensees [56351. - 56352.]

56351.

A claim may not be made against the seller of any farm product by a licensee pursuant to this chapter, and no credit may be allowed to such licensee against another licensee or a producer of any farm product by reason of damage to or loss, dumping, or disposal of any farm product which is sold to such licensee, in any payment, accounting, or settlement which is made by the licensee to the producer or other licensee, unless the licensee has secured and is in possession of a certificate issued by a county agricultural commissioner, a county health officer, the director, a duly authorized officer of the State Board of Health, or by some other official now or hereafter authorized by law. The certificate shall state that the farm product which is involved has been damaged, dumped, destroyed, or otherwise disposed of as unfit for human consumption or as in violation of the fruit and vegetable standards which are contained in Division 17 (commencing with Section 42501) of this code.

A private third-party inspection based on the standards prescribed in the United States Agricultural Marketing Act of 1946 may be substituted for such certificate if the director determines that an inspection certificate cannot be reasonably obtained. Where the director determines that neither an inspection certificate nor a private third-party inspection can be reasonably obtained, the signed statement of two or more disinterested or otherwise independent parties who have sufficient knowledge acquired through education or experience to evaluate the farm product involved may be used to describe the type and extent of the quality and condition factors present upon inspection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 871.)
-------------------------------------------

56352.

The certificate is not valid as proof of a proper claim, credit, or offset unless it is issued within 24 hours of the receipt by the licensee of the farm product which is involved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 915.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Examinations and Audits [56381. - 56383.]

56381.

(a) If, in the opinion of the department, there appears to be reasonable grounds for investigating a complaint or notification made under the provisions of this chapter, the department shall investigate the complaint or notification. In the course of the investigation, if the department determines that violations of this chapter are indicated other than alleged violations specified in the complaint or notification that served as the basis for the investigation, the department may expand the investigation to include the additional violations.

(b) In the opinion of the department, if an investigation substantiates the existence of violations of this chapter, the department may cause a complaint to be issued.

(c) The investigation may include, but shall not be construed to require, examinations and audits of the books and records of any licensee pertaining to the solvency of the licensee, or to the purchase or handling of and accounting for any farm product purchased or received on consignment from another licensee or the producer, or handled as a brokerage transaction. The department may examine and audit all pertinent books, records, weight certificates, receipts, ledgers, journals, papers, contracts, bank statements, canceled checks, and other documents of the licensee that show or tend to show facts regarding the financial condition and the number and status of accounts of growers and others who are doing business with the licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 696, Sec. 68.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

56382.

If the examination discloses evidence of any violation of this chapter, the department may issue a complaint detailing the charges and the discipline sought in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 696, Sec. 69.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

56382.5.

(a) (1) An aggrieved grower or licensee with a complaint that is not subject to the federal Packers and Stockyards Act, 1921 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 181 et seq.) or the federal Perishable Agricultural Commodities Act, 1930 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 499a et seq.) may seek resolution of that complaint by filing a complaint with the department within nine months from the date a complete account of sales was due. The complaint shall be accompanied by two copies of all documents in the complainant’s possession that are relevant to establishing the complaint, a filing fee in the amount specified in the fee schedule set forth in paragraph (2), and a written denial of jurisdiction from the appropriate federal agency unless the commodity involved clearly does not fall under the federal Packers and Stockyards Act, 1921 (7 U.S.C. Sec.
 181 et seq.) or the federal Perishable Agricultural Commodities Act, 1930 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 499a et seq.). Within five business days of receipt of a signed and verified complaint, the filing fee, and the denials of federal jurisdiction, the department shall serve the verified complaint on the respondent. Service shall be by certified mail. The department, the secretary, the department’s employees, the department’s agents, the boards and commissions associated with the department, their employees or agents, and the State of California are not parties to the dispute in a proceeding brought under this section.

(2) The complaint filing fee schedule shall be as follows:

(A) For complaints alleging an amount due of less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), the filing fee shall be two hundred dollars ($200).

(B) For
 complaints alleging an amount due of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or more but less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), the filing fee shall be three hundred dollars ($300).

(C) For complaints alleging an amount due of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) or more, the filing fee shall be five hundred dollars ($500).

(b) The respondent served shall answer within 30 calendar days of service. The respondent’s response shall include two copies of all relevant documentation of the transactions referred to in the verified complaint.

(c) Within 30 calendar days of receipt of the answer, the department shall issue to both parties a written factual summary on the basis of the documents that have been filed with the department.

(d) If a settlement is not reached within 30 calendar days after the department’s summary is issued, the department, on request of the claimant or respondent and upon payment of a filing fee of three hundred dollars ($300), shall schedule alternate dispute resolution, to commence within 90 calendar days. The department shall serve both parties with a notice of hearing, which sets out the time, date, street address, room number, telephone number, and name of the hearing officer. Service of the notice of hearing shall be by certified mail.

(e) The alternate dispute resolution shall proceed as follows:

(1) The hearing shall be conducted by hearing officers in accordance with standard procedures promulgated by the American Arbitration Association or other acceptable alternative dispute resolution entities.

(2) The hearing officers shall be familiar with the type of issues presented by such claims, but need not be attorneys.

(3) The sole parties to the proceedings shall be the complainant and the respondent.

(4) The disputes, claims, and interests of the department or the State of California are not within the jurisdiction of the proceedings.

(5) The validity of a regulation of the department or order promulgated pursuant to this code is not within the jurisdiction of the proceedings.

(6) Law and motion matters shall be handled by the assigned hearing officer.

(7) The hearing officer has no authority to enter into settlement discussions, except upon stipulation of the parties
 involved.

(8) The parties may represent themselves in propria persona or may be represented by a licensed attorney at law. A party may not be represented by a representative who is not licensed to practice law.

(9) To the extent of any conflict between Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and this article, this article shall prevail.

(10) The hearing officer may order a review of records or an audit of records by a certified public accountant. The review or audit shall be conducted under generally accepted auditing standards of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants, and upon completion of the review or audit the nature and extent of the review or audit shall be disclosed to the parties by the auditor in the audit report. The audit
 report shall disclose the number of transactions reviewed and the rationale for selecting those transactions. The department shall advance the costs of the audit or review of records, but the hearing officer shall apportion the costs at the conclusion of the hearing. The department shall pursue repayment in accordance with the hearing officer’s apportionment and may bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to recover funds advanced. This subdivision does not require the department to pursue any specific remedy or prohibit the department from accepting a reasonable repayment plan.

(f) The hearing officer shall render a written decision within 60 days of submission of the case for decision. In addition to rendering a written finding as to what is owed by whom on the substantive allegations of the complaint, the hearing officer shall decide whether or not to order the full cost of the alternative dispute resolution proceeding, and in
 what ratio or order the losing party is to pay the costs of the proceeding. For these purposes, the cost of the alternative dispute resolution proceeding does not include the filing fee, the parties’ attorney fees, or expert witness fees. The hearing officer may also award a sanction against a complainant for filing a frivolous complaint or against a respondent for unreasonable delay tactics, bad faith bargaining, or resistance to the claim, of either 10 percent of the amount of the award or a specific amount, up to a maximum of one thousand dollars ($1,000). Any sanction award shall not be deemed to be res judicata or collateral estoppel in any subsequent case in which either the complainant or respondent is charged with filing a frivolous complaint, unreasonable delay tactics, bad faith bargaining, or resistance to the claim. The department may consider the written decision of the hearing officer in determining any related licensing action. The written decision of the hearing officer may be introduced as
 evidence at a court proceeding.

(g) This section does not prohibit the parties to the dispute from settling their dispute before, during, or after the hearing.

(h) This section does not alter, preclude, or condition the exercise, during any stage of the proceedings provided by this chapter, of any other rights to relief a party may have through petition to a court of competent jurisdiction, including, but not limited to, small claims court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 603, Sec. 7.   (SB 1270)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

56382.8.

(a) In addition to all other complaint procedures provided for in this chapter, any aggrieved grower or licensee with a complaint that is not subject to the federal Packers and Stockyards Act, 1921 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 181 et seq.) or the federal Perishable Agricultural Commodities Act, 1930 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 499a et seq.) and for which the claim for damages does not exceed thirty thousand dollars ($30,000), may file a verified complaint with the department, subject to expedited review and settlement. Informal complaints may be made for damages, but not for disciplinary action, although the department may issue a complaint pursuant to Section 56382 as the basis for disciplinary action. Informal complaints must be received by the department within nine
 months of when the claimant ought to have reasonably known of its existence, as required under Section 56446.

(b) Complaints must be submitted to the department in writing and verified, and may be transmitted via United States mail, overnight delivery, or by facsimile transmission, setting forth the essential details of the transactions complained of, including the following:

(1) The name and address of each party to the dispute, of the agent representing him or her in the transaction involved, if any, as well as the party’s counsel, if any.

(2) The quantity and quality or grade of each kind of produce shipped if a grade or quality is the basis of payment.

(3) The date of shipment.

(4) The
 carrier identification if a carrier was used.

(5) The shipping and destination points.

(6) If a sale, the date, sales price, and amount actually received.

(7) If a consignment, the date, reported proceeds, gross, and net.

(8) A precise estimate of the amount of damages claimed, if known.

(9) A brief statement of material facts in dispute, including terms of applicable contracts.

(10) The amount of damages being sought.

(c) The complaint shall also, so far as practicable, be accompanied by true copies of all available papers relating to the transaction complained
 about, including shipping documents, letters, telegrams, invoices, manifests, inspection certificates, accountings, accounts of sale, and any special contracts or agreements.

(d) The informal complaint shall be accompanied by a nonrefundable filing fee of one hundred dollars ($100) as required under Section 56382.5.

(e) Upon confirmation that a complaint has been properly and timely filed, including the securing of a denial letter from the United States Department of Agriculture under the federal Packers and Stockyards Act, 1921, or the federal Perishable Agricultural Commodities Act, 1930, the department shall send a copy of the complaint to the respondent by certified mail and advise the respondent that it shall have 30 days from the department’s mailing of the complaint in which to answer the complaint. The answer shall contain a brief response to the complaint, including the
 respondent’s position with respect to the claimant’s description of matters in dispute, the relevant facts, and the remedy sought, together with a description of any claims it may have against the complainant, in the same manner as claims are to be set out in the complaint. The respondent shall also include any pertinent documentation relevant to its defense with its answer.

(f) After receipt of the answer from the respondent, the department shall informally consult with the parties to clarify the nature of the dispute and to facilitate the exchange of information between the parties in order to assist the parties in reaching an expedited informal resolution of the dispute. The informal consultation process will last no longer than 60 days. The parties shall cooperate fully with the department and shall participate in the informal consultation process.

(g) If the informal
 consultation process provided for in this section does not result in resolution of the dispute, the complainant may then pursue arbitration against the licensee and the complaint and any counterclaim will be fully and finally adjudicated and resolved by a decision of an arbitrator under expedited arbitration procedures as follows:

(1) The complainant shall submit a fee of six hundred dollars ($600) to the department made payable to the arbitrator, arbitration service, or payee designated by the department for the arbitration and any counterclaimant shall submit a fee of six hundred dollars ($600) to the department for any counterclaim that is filed also made payable to the arbitrator, arbitration service, or payee designated by the department.

(2) An arbitrator from a panel of arbitrators registered with the department shall be selected by the department and confirmed by both the
 complainant and the respondent or counterclaimant after the prospective arbitrator has certified that he or she has no known conflict of interest in the dispute and after each party has had an opportunity to lodge an objection for cause to the appointment of the named arbitrator within five days of its receipt of the notice of appointment of the arbitrator. The notice of appointment shall be in writing and may be transmitted via overnight delivery or by facsimile transmission.

(3) Upon confirmation of the appointment of the arbitrator the department will transmit to the arbitrator the verified complaint, the statement of defense, and the statement of counterclaim, if one is filed.

(4) The complainant shall have 30 days after receipt of the notice of appointment of the arbitrator to submit to the department in writing sworn declarations by witnesses and any other documentary
 evidence not previously submitted, as well as legal authorities and arguments.

(5) Within five days of the department’s receipt of the complainant’s written submission the department shall transmit a copy of the complainant’s written submission to the respondent. The respondent shall have 30 days from the receipt of the complainant’s written submission to submit to the department in writing responsive declarations by witnesses or other documentary evidence not previously submitted, as well as any legal authorities and arguments. The respondent’s written submission in support of its counterclaim, if any, must be sent to the department at the same time as the responsive submission.

(6) If there is a counterclaim filed, within five days of the department’s receipt of the counterclaimant’s written submission the department shall transmit a copy of the counterclaimant’s written
 submission to the complainant. The complainant shall have 10 days from the receipt of the counterclaimant’s written submission to submit any witness statements, evidence, or legal authorities and arguments in reply.

(7) Once all periods for submission of evidence and arguments have expired and the department has transmitted all written submissions to the arbitrator, the case and all evidence to be considered by the arbitrator shall be deemed to be submitted.

(8) The arbitrator may, in the interest of justice, briefly extend the time periods for written submissions by either party.

(9) The arbitrator shall issue his or her arbitration decision and award in writing within 30 days after the case has been submitted for a decision. This time period may be extended by the arbitrator if, in his or her judgment, clarification of the evidence
 submitted is required from either the complainant, the respondent or counterclaimant, or both.

(10) No hearings or live testimony shall be conducted under the expedited arbitration procedures.

(11) The arbitrator shall award interest at the legal rate to be paid in addition to any damages that are awarded and the arbitrator may award the recovery of costs to one party to the arbitration or apportion costs between the parties as he or she deems appropriate. Costs may include filing fees, mediation fees and expenses, fees or expenses incurred by the department, and fees paid to expert witnesses, auditors, or inspectors, but not attorney’s fees, unless there has been an agreement by the parties that the prevailing party in any dispute shall be entitled to recover reasonable attorney’s fees as part of any award for damages, and in that case, the arbitrator may award reasonable
 attorney’s fees to the prevailing party.

(h) Either party to an expedited arbitration proceeding conducted pursuant to this section may bring an action in any California court of competent jurisdiction to enforce any awards for damages made pursuant to this section. If an enforcement action is necessary to secure payment of awards for damages, the party initiating the enforcement proceeding shall be entitled to recover all additional expenses, costs, and attorney’s fees incurred in connection with that proceeding.

(i) The department shall retain jurisdiction, as provided for
 under Section 56445, over any matter in which a licensee refuses to pay or otherwise comply with an arbitrator’s decision conducted pursuant to the expedited arbitration procedures as set forth herein, and may immediately commence an action to revoke the license of the licensee.

(j) A complainant may enforce his or her rights through the verified complaint and expedited arbitration process as provided herein, or by a civil action brought in any court of competent jurisdiction. This section shall in no way abridge, preclude, or alter other remedies available to the parties now existing under common law or by statute, and the provisions set forth herein are in addition to those other remedies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 382, Sec. 7.   (AB 2240)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

56383.

The failure or refusal of any licensee to produce and make available to the director any such books or records, or otherwise to obstruct such examination or audit, is a good and sufficient ground for the suspension or revocation of his license.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)